Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.35.700

Construction, remodeling, improvement, financing, etc.—Authorized.

The boards of trustees of the regional universities and of The Evergreen State College are empowered in accordance with the provisions of RCW 28B.35.700 through 28B.35.790, to provide for the construction, completion, reconstruction, remodeling, rehabilitation and improvement of buildings and facilities authorized by the legislature for the use of the aforementioned universities and The Evergreen State College and to finance the payment thereof by bonds payable out of special funds from revenues hereafter derived from the payment of building fees, gifts, bequests or grants and such additional funds as the legislature may provide.

[ 1985 c 390 s 48; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 82; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.40.700. Prior: 1967 c 47 s 12; 1961 ex.s. c 14 s 1. Formerly RCW 28B.40.700; 28.81.500.]

NOTES:

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.